Mississippi, session 2026, SB2704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act may be known and shall be cited as the "Association Self-Funded Health Benefit Plan Coverage Act." SECTION 2.  It is the purpose and intent of the Association Self-Funded Health Benefit Plan Coverage Act to provide additional group health benefit plan coverage options to professional associations and trade associations located in the State of Mississippi by allowing their members to purchase coverage from self-funded association plans that are subject to the jurisdiction of another state insurance department or the federal government. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following words have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Association self-funded health benefit plan" means a self-funded health benefit plan established in its domiciliary jurisdiction for the members of a professional association or trade association to provide group hospital, surgical or medical expense benefits to association members and their employees, including dependents. (b)  "Commissioner or Commissioner of Insurance" shall mean the Commissioner of Insurance of the State of Mississippi. (c)  "Fully insured association health benefit plan" means an association health benefit plan which provides group coverage for hospital, surgical or medical expense benefits, all of which are guaranteed under a contract or policy of insurance issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. (d)  "Professional association" means member employers and individual members who are self-employed, who are of the same type of profession, such as lawyers, physicians, dentists, accountants, or architects; but is not limited to those professions.  However, the profession must be one that is recognized by the required licensing agency. (e)  "Trade association" means member employers and individual members who are self-employed, who are in the same type of trade, such as plumbers or electricians; and any others that are trade designations as recognized by the required licensing agency. SECTION 4. (1)  Except as expressly provided in this act, the insurance laws of the State of Mississippi, as set forth in Title 83 of the Mississippi Code, shall not apply to any association self-funded health benefit plan that provides group coverage for hospital, surgical or medical expense benefits if the plan can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of Insurance that the plan is subject to the jurisdiction of another state insurance department or the federal government by providing the commissioner with the appropriate certificate, license or written authorization issued by the other governmental agency that permits or otherwise qualifies the plan to provide group coverage for hospital, surgical or medical expense benefits. (2)  In addition to any other requirements as set forth in this act, to be eligible to provide association group hospital, surgical or medical expense benefit coverage in this state, and to qualify for the exemption from Title 83 of the Mississippi Code as set forth in this section, an association self-funded health benefit plan shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner the following: (a)  That the plan was established in its domiciliary jurisdiction for the members of a professional association or trade association that has been organized and maintained in good faith for a continuous period of three (3) years for purposes other than that of obtaining or providing insurance. (b)  That the plan will only provide group coverage in this state through an association whose members are in the same trade or profession and that has been organized and maintained in this state in good faith for a continuous period of three (3) years for purposes other than that of obtaining or providing insurance. (c)  That the plan is in compliance with applicable laws in its domiciliary jurisdiction and any applicable requirements under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, addressing coverage, financial and reserve requirements. (d)  That the rates are not inadequate, excessive, or unfairly discriminatory and are appropriate for the classes of risks for which they have been computed. (e)  That the plan is being operated in accordance with sound actuarial principles and is designed to provide sufficient revenues to pay current and future liabilities. (f)  That the plan is neither offered nor advertised to the public generally. (g)  That the plan is required under the laws of its domiciliary jurisdiction to maintain excess insurance with a retention level determined in accordance with sound actuarial principles. (h)  That the plan is required under the laws of its domiciliary jurisdiction to establish and maintain appropriate loss reserves determined in accordance with sound actuarial principles. (i)  That the plan is a nonprofit organization. (i)  Upon demonstrating to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the Association Self-Funded Health Benefit Plan is in compliance with the provisions of this act, the plan shall be exempt from all other provisions of Title 83 of the Mississippi Code and shall not be regulated by the Mississippi Insurance Department. (ii)  An association self-funded health benefit plan that receives an initial exemption under this section from Title 83 of the Mississippi Code shall certify to the commissioner each year thereafter, on or before February 15th, that the plan continues to meet the eligibility requirements contained in this act.  Failure to meet and maintain the eligibility requirements set forth in this act shall be grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of the plan's exemption from Title 83 of the Mississippi Code and its eligibility to provide group health benefit coverage in this state. SECTION 5. Any person who participates in an association self-funded health benefit plan in Mississippi as described in this act shall be provided written notice that the plan is not regulated by the Mississippi Insurance Department and every purchaser or prospective purchaser shall be provided written notice that the person's benefit plan is not otherwise regulated under Mississippi law. SECTION 6. Any purchaser or prospective purchaser of coverage under an association self-funded health benefit plan as described in this act shall be provided written notice that the benefit plan is not covered by the Mississippi Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association. SECTION 7. Any purchaser or prospective purchaser of coverage under an association self-funded health benefit plan as described in this act shall be provided written notice that neither the costs of the plan, benefits, nor the benefit plan are regulated by the Mississippi Insurance Department. SECTION 8. Individuals in this state eligible for coverage under an association self-funded health benefit plan shall be an employee who is covered by an association plan in which an employer is participating or a self-employed individual who is covered by an association plan, including a dependent of an employee or self-employed individual as defined under the terms of the plan. SECTION 9. This act shall not apply to a fully insured association health benefit plan or to an association self-funded health benefit plan that is exempt from state insurance regulation in accordance with the provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. SECTION 10. Nothing in this act shall preclude an association from engaging an insurance producer licensed to sell health insurance in this state for the purposes of reviewing and considering any group health plan offered to an association under this act. SECTION 11. When reviewing an association self-funded health benefit plan's request for a determination by the commissioner whether the plan is exempt from Title 83 of the Mississippi Code and is authorized under this act to provide group health benefit coverage through a professional or trade association in this state, the commissioner may retain attorneys, actuaries, certified public accountants or other professionals and specialists to assist in completing the review, the reasonable cost of which shall be borne by the plan which requested the determination. SECTION 12. Any third-party administrator administering an association self-funded health benefit plan in this state shall be licensed pursuant to the provisions of Section 83-18-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 13. An association self-funded health benefit plan providing coverage in this state pursuant to this act shall designate the commissioner as its agent solely for the purpose of receiving service of legal documents or process, for which a filing fee shall be determined by the commissioner. SECTION 14. An order issued by any District Court of the United States enjoining an association self-funded health benefit plan from operating in any state (or in all states or in any territory or possession of the United States) upon a finding that such a group is in hazardous financial condition or financially impaired condition shall be enforceable in the courts of this state. SECTION 15. The commissioner may adopt such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after October 1, 2026.